Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB964.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Victims of Violence Safe Employment Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abuse of a vulnerable adult." The term includes:(1) Force or threat of force of inappropriate use of medications or physical or chemical restraints.(2) Misuse of power or authority granted to a person through a power of attorney or by a court in a guardianship 1234567891011121314151617 or conservatorship proceeding that results in unreasonable confinement or restriction of liberty.(3) An act of violence against, or the taking, transferring, concealing, harming or disposing of, an emotional support or service animal owned, possessed or held by a vulnerable adult.(4) The failure of a caregiver to provide goods, care or services essential to avoid a clear and serious threat to the physical or mental health of a vulnerable adult.(5) An act or course of conduct by a caregiver against a vulnerable adult or a vulnerable adult's resources, without the informed consent of the vulnerable adult or with consent obtained through misrepresentation, coercion or threats of force, that results in monetary, personal or other benefit, gain or profit for the perpetrator or monetary or personal loss to the vulnerable adult.(6) The desertion of a vulnerable adult by a caregiver.(7) Knowingly restricting the movement or independence of a vulnerable adult without the vulnerable adult's consent by removing means of transportation, communication or access to other activities of daily living, including removing access to assistive technology, communication devices or mobility aids."Attesting third party." A disability service organization manager or coordinator, caregiver agency coordinator or manager, a law enforcement official, licensed health care professional, licensed social worker, victim advocate or victim service provider."Department." The Department of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth.20250HB0964PN1041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Domestic violence." The occurrence of any of the following acts between family or household members as defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions):(1) Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing, or attempting to cause, bodily injury, serious bodily injury or sexual violence.(2) Placing another individual in reasonable fear of imminent serious bodily harm.(3) An act of domestic and other violence as defined under 55 Pa. Code § 3042.3 (relating to definitions).(4) The infliction of false imprisonment under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2903 (relating to false imprisonment)."Employee." An individual who is employed by an employer in this Commonwealth."Employer." As defined in section 103 of the Workers' Compensation Act."Family member." Includes any of the following:(1) A biological child, adopted or foster child, stepchild or legal ward, a child of a domestic partner or a child to whom an employee stands in loco parentis, regardless of age.(2) A biological parent, foster parent, stepparent or adoptive parent or legal guardian of an employee or an employee's spouse or domestic partner or an individual who stood in loco parentis when the employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner was a minor child.(3) An individual to whom the employee is legally married under the laws of any state or a domestic partner of an employee as registered under the laws of any state or political subdivision.20250HB0964PN1041 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) A grandparent, grandchild or sibling, whether of a biological, foster, adoptive or step relationship, of the employee or the employee's spouse or domestic partner.(5) An individual who has an intimate or romantic relationship with an employee.(6) An individual who habitually resides in a dwelling unit with an employee or has previously habitually resided in a dwelling unit with an employee for a period of not less than two years.(7) An individual who has established an emotionally significant relationship with an employee, and for whom the employee is responsible for providing or arranging health or safety-related care, including helping the person obtain diagnostic, preventive, routine or therapeutic health treatment or ensuring the individual is safe after becoming a victim of a qualifying act.(8) An individual whose close association with an employee is the equivalent of a family relationship."Nontraditional medicine." The term includes massage therapy, acupuncture or cultural or traditional-based healing."Qualifying act." An act, conduct or pattern of conduct that could constitute any of the following, regardless of whether anyone is arrested or charged with committing a crime:(1) Domestic violence.(2) Sexual violence.(3) Stalking.(4) Abuse of a vulnerable adult.(5) An act or conduct in which a person uses force to cause or attempt to cause physical or mental injury to another. This does not include conduct arising out of the 20250HB0964PN1041 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, except when the person engaging in the conduct intended to cause or intended to threaten to cause physical or mental injury or when the person engaging in the conduct was under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance.(6) An act or conduct in which a person makes a reasonably perceived or actual threat of physical or mental injury or death to another. This does not include conduct arising out of the ownership, maintenance or use of a motor vehicle, except when the person engaging in the conduct intended to cause or intended to threaten to cause physical or mental injury or when the person engaging in the conduct was under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance."Retaliatory personnel action." One of the following:(1) A threat, discipline, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours or any other adverse action taken against an employee for exercising the rights and protections under this act.(2) Interference with or punishment for participating in or acting on a complaint or appeal under this act."Secretary." The Secretary of Labor and Industry of the Commonwealth."Sexual violence." As defined in 42 Pa.C.S. § 62A03 (relating to definitions)."Stalking." Conduct in which an individual either:(1) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly commits acts toward another individual, including following the other individual without proper authority:(i) under circumstances which demonstrate either an intent to place the other individual in reasonable fear 20250HB0964PN1041 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to the other individual; or(ii) which as a result intentionally, knowingly or recklessly places the other individual in reasonable fear of bodily injury or causes substantial emotional distress to the other individual; or(2) engages in a course of conduct or repeatedly communicates to another individual:(i) under circumstances which demonstrate or communicate either an intent to place the other individual in reasonable fear of bodily injury or to cause substantial emotional distress to the other individual; or(ii) which as a result intentionally, knowingly or recklessly places the other individual in reasonable fear of bodily injury or causes substantial emotional distress to the other individual."Treatment." Includes:(1) Medical, dental, psychological, mental health, chiropractic or physical rehabilitation services.(2) Remedial treatment or care.(3) Nontraditional medicine.(4) Other services rendered in accordance with a religious or culturally-specific method of healing."Victim." Any of the following:(1) An individual against whom a qualifying act was committed.(2) An individual who was physically present at the scene of a qualifying act and witnessed the qualifying act, but who did not commit the qualifying act, and who as a 20250HB0964PN1041 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 direct result:(i) suffers physical or mental injury; or(ii) reasonably believes that the individual is under the threat of physical harm.(3) An individual who died by suicide."Victim advocate." An individual, whether paid or serving as a volunteer, who provides services to victims or the victims' family members under the auspices or supervision of a victim service provider or a court or a law enforcement or prosecution agency."Victim service provider." An agency or organization that provides services to victims or victims' family members. The term includes a rape crisis center as defined under 42 Pa.C.S. § 5945.1(a) (relating to confidential communications with sexual assault counselors), domestic violence program as defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102(a) (relating to definitions) or an agency or organization with a documented history of providing services to victims."Workers' Compensation Act." The act of June 2, 1915 (P.L.736, No.338), known as the Workers' Compensation Act.Section 3. Employment leave for victims and family members of victims.(a) Leave requirement.--(1) An employee who is a victim of a qualifying act or has a family member who is a victim of a qualifying act may request and an employer shall permit the employee to take leave from work if the employee needs, or needs to assist a family member, to do any of the following:(i) Seek or obtain medical attention, rehabilitative services, accessibility equipment or other treatment 20250HB0964PN1041 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 related to a physical or mental injury or disability caused or aggravated by the qualifying act.(ii) Recover from a physical or mental injury or disability caused or aggravated by the qualifying act.(iii) Seek or obtain services from a victim service provider in relation to the qualifying act.(iv) Seek or obtain mental health treatment or other counseling in relation to the qualifying act.(v) Relocate or engage in the process of securing a new residence due to the qualifying act, including securing temporary or permanent housing or enrolling children in a new school.(vi) Seek or obtain financial services or meet with a financial professional to address financial issues resulting from the qualifying act.(vii) Seek, obtain or provide child care or care to a care-dependent adult necessary as a result of the qualifying act.(viii) Seek or obtain legal services related to or resulting from the qualifying act.(ix) Prepare for, participate in or attend any civil, administrative or criminal legal proceeding relating to or resulting from the qualifying act.(x) Make modifications to a home or vehicle necessary to create usability of and accessibility to the home or vehicle due to an injury sustained in a qualifying act.(xi) Seek or obtain new caregiver services.(xii) Take any other actions necessary to protect or restore the physical, mental, emotional or economic well-20250HB0964PN1041 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 being as a result of the qualifying act.(xiii) Attend or make arrangements for the memorial service, funeral or alternative to a funeral of a victim who died as a result of a qualifying act, or grieve the death of a victim who died as a result of a qualifying act.(2) An employee shall be entitled to use 20 workweeks of leave in aggregate during any 12-month period for any purpose listed under paragraph (1)(i) or (ii). An employee shall be entitled to use 12 workweeks of leave combined during any 12-month period for other purposes listed under paragraph (1). This act may not create a right for an employee to take leave under this act that exceeds a combined total of 20 weeks in any 12-month period regardless of reason.(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2), an employee shall be entitled to use 2 workweeks or 10 work days of leave for the purposes listed under paragraph (1)(xiii) for each death of a family member from a qualifying act in any 12-month period. Leave taken for the purposes described in paragraph (1)(xiii) shall be deducted from, and is not in addition to, the total leave time an employee shall be entitled to under this section, and shall not otherwise limit or diminish the total leave time an employee is entitled to under this section.(4) An employee shall be entitled to utilize the leave authorized under this section, at the option of the employee, on a consecutive, intermittent or reduced leave schedule in which all of the leave authorized under this section is not taken consecutively.(5) An employee taking leave for a purpose listed under paragraph (1) shall make a reasonable effort to schedule 20250HB0964PN1041 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 matters so as not to unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.(b) Notice.--(1) An employee shall provide the employer with reasonable advance notice of the employee's intention to take leave under subsection (a). When an unscheduled absence occurs, the employer may not take any action against the employee if the employee, upon request of the employer and within a reasonable period after the absence, informs the employer that the employee's leave was for a purpose described by subsection (a)(1), or if the absence was for a period of more than three days, provides the employer with a form of documentation described by subsection (c).(2) For an absence of more than three days, the employer may require that the employee, within a reasonable period after the absence, provide certification under subsection (c). If an employer requires certification under subsection (c), the employer shall submit the request for certification to the employee in writing and give the employee a reasonable amount of time to provide the certification.(3) Nothing in this act shall be construed to require an employee to take leave under this section, if the employee has not requested leave as a result of a qualifying act. An employer may not require an employee who has not requested leave under this section to take leave under this section.(c) Certification.--(1) An employer may require an employee to provide certification to the employer that the employee or the employee's family member is a victim if the employee is absent for more than three days for a purpose described under 20250HB0964PN1041 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a)(1).(2) If the employer requests in writing that the employee provide certification, the employee shall provide the certification to the employer within a reasonable period after the employer requests certification.(3) An employee may satisfy the certification requirement under paragraph (1) by providing to the employer any one of the following:(i) a copy of a valid court order that restrains the person alleged to have committed the qualifying act from contact with the employee or family member of the employee;(ii) medical or mental health records indicating that the employee or family member is a victim;(iii) a police report documenting the act of which the employee or family member is a victim;(iv) evidence that the person alleged to have committed the qualifying act has been charged with or convicted of an act of which the employee or employee's family member is a victim;(v) a written certification signed by an attesting third party that affirms that the employee or employee's family member is a victim;(vi) if the employee's family member is a victim who is deceased as a result of the qualifying act:(A) a written verification of death, burial or memorial services from a mortuary, medical examiner, coroner, funeral home, burial society, crematorium, religious institution or other government agency;(B) a published obituary; or20250HB0964PN1041 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (C) a death certificate; or(vii) any other form of documentation that reasonably verifies that the employee or employee's family member is a victim, including a written statement signed by the employee, or signed by an individual authorized to act on the employee's behalf.(4) Furnishing evidence or providing a certification under this subsection shall not waive any confidentiality or privilege that may exist between the employee or victim and a third party.(5) An employer may not require that an employee provide a certification that explains the details of the qualifying act. An employer may not require disclosure of details relating to a qualifying act or the details of an employee's or employee's family member's medical condition as a condition of providing leave under this act.(d) Confidentiality.--All information provided to the employer under subsection (b) or (c), including the fact that the employee has requested or obtained leave under this section, shall be retained in the strictest confidence by the employer, except to the extent that disclosure is:(1) requested or consented to in writing by the employee; or(2) otherwise required by applicable Federal or State law in which case the employer shall provide the employee notice prior to any authorized disclosure.(e) Employment and benefits protection.--(1) No employer may take retaliatory personnel action or discriminate against an employee because:(i) the employee has requested leave under 20250HB0964PN1041 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a);(ii) the employee has taken leave under subsection (a); or(iii) the employee has made a complaint or filed an action to enforce the employee's right to leave under subsection (a).(2) An employee who takes leave under subsection (a) shall, on return from the leave, be entitled to:(i) restoration to the position held by the employee when leave commenced; or(ii) restoration to an equivalent position with equivalent employment benefits, pay and other terms and conditions of employment.(3) The taking of leave under subsection (a) shall not result in the loss of any employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which the leave commenced.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to entitle a restored employee to:(i) the accrual of any seniority or employment benefit during a period of leave; or(ii) a right, benefit or position other than a right, benefit or position to which the restored employee would have been entitled had the restored employee not taken the leave.(f) Health insurance coverage.--During a period that an employee takes leave under subsection (a), the employer shall maintain coverage under a group health plan for the duration of the leave at the same level and under the same conditions that would have been provided if the employee's employment had not been interrupted by the leave.20250HB0964PN1041 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 4. Coordination of leave.(a) Leave concurrent with Federal law.--Leave taken under this act that also qualifies as leave under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28 (relating to family and medical leave) shall run concurrently with leave taken under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 28.(b) Other paid or unpaid leave.--An employee who is entitled to take paid or unpaid leave, including family, medical, sick, annual, personal or similar leave, from employment, under Federal, State or local law, a collective bargaining agreement or an employment benefits program, policy or plan, may elect to substitute a period of that leave for an equivalent period of leave provided under section 3, provided that it does not conflict with Federal law. Employers shall provide employees with written notice of the opportunity to make the election and inform employees how leave will be coordinated absent any election.Section 5. Reasonable accommodations.(a) Requirement.--An employer shall provide a reasonable accommodation in accordance with this section to an employee who is a victim or who has a family member who is a victim if the employee requests the reasonable accommodation for the safety, physical or psychological well-being of the employee related to a qualifying act of which the employee or family member of the employee is a victim.(b) Types of accommodation.--A reasonable accommodation, for the purposes of this section, may include any of the following:(1) Implementation of safety measures or procedures at the employee's workplace.(2) A transfer, reassignment, leave or modified work schedule for the employee.20250HB0964PN1041 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) A change of work telephone number, email address or work station for the employee.(4) Removal of the employee's name or contact information from public-facing websites and communications.(5) Installation of new locks or security devices, or a change in locks or security devices, at the employee's workplace.(6) Assistance in documenting a qualifying act that occurs at the employee's workplace.(7) Referral to a victim services provider.(8) Any other reasonable accommodation in response to the qualifying act or threat of future harm related to the qualifying act.(c) Process.--The employer and the employee shall engage in a timely, good faith and interactive process to determine any reasonable accommodations required under this section. In determining the reasonable accommodation, the employer shall consider any exigent circumstance or danger facing the employee related to the qualifying act.(d) Limitation.--An employer may not provide a reasonable accommodation under this section if the employee has not disclosed the employee's or employee's family member's status as a victim to the employer. An employer may require an employee who requests an accommodation under this section to provide the following:(1) A written statement from the employee, or a person acting on the employee's behalf, stating that the employee or employee's family member is a victim and that the requested accommodation is necessary as a result of the applicable qualifying act.20250HB0964PN1041 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) A certification to demonstrate that the employee or employee's family member is a victim. The employer shall accept any form of certification listed in section 3(c)(3) as certification. The employee shall choose which document listed in section 3(c)(3) to submit, and the employer may not request or require more than one form of certification under section 3(c)(3) to be submitted during the same 12-month period that a reasonable accommodation is requested or granted if the reason for an accommodation request is related to the same qualifying act or related to a separate qualifying act committed by the same person who committed the original qualifying act. If an employer requires certification under this subsection, the employer may require the employee to provide a written statement from the employee recertifying that the requested accommodation is still necessary for the safety, physical or psychological well-being of the employee as a result of the applicable qualifying act every six months.(e) Exception for undue hardship.--This section may not require an employer to take any action or provide any accommodation that would place an undue hardship on the employer's business operations.Section 6. Prohibited acts by employer.(a) Prohibition.--An employer, or a person acting on behalf of an employer, may not interfere with, restrain or deny the exercise of or the attempted exercise of a right provided by this act.(b) Discrimination.--An employer may not discharge, demote, suspend, take or threaten to take disciplinary or retaliatory personnel action or in any other manner discriminate against an 20250HB0964PN1041 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employee for any of the following:(1) Taking or requesting leave in accordance with this act, regardless of whether the leave was granted.(2) Receiving or requesting a reasonable accommodation under this act, regardless of whether the accommodation was granted.(3) Making a complaint or filing an action to enforce the employee's right to leave under this act or right to a reasonable accommodation in accordance with this act.(c) Retaliatory action.--An employer's absence control policy may not treat leave time taken in accordance with this act as an absence that may lead to or result in retaliatory personnel action.(d) Allegations in good faith.--The protections under this section apply to any person who mistakenly but in good faith alleges a violation of this section.(e) Rebuttable presumption.--There is a rebuttable presumption of a violation of this section if an employer takes retaliatory personnel action against a person within 90 days after that person does any of the following:(1) Files a complaint with the department or a court alleging a violation of this act.(2) Informs a person about an employer's alleged violation of this act.(3) Cooperates with the department or another person in the investigation of an alleged violation of this act.(4) Opposes a policy, practice or act that is prohibited under this act.(5) Informs an individual of the individual's rights under this act.20250HB0964PN1041 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 7. Employer duties.(a) Poster.--Beginning 270 days after the effective date of this subsection, an employer shall display and maintain a poster at the employer's place of business, in a conspicuous place that is accessible to employees, that contains all of the following information in plain language and in English and Spanish, with consideration to the inclusion of other significant languages spoken in the workplace:(1) That an employee who is a victim, or who has a family member who is a victim, may be eligible for leave or reasonable accommodations under this act.(2) That an employee is eligible regardless of whether a crime has been reported and regardless of whether anyone has been arrested or charged with committing a crime relating to the applicable qualifying act.(3) The terms under which an employee may use leave under this act, as described under section 3.(4) The employee's right to take civil action for any violation of this act.(b) Written notice distribution.--Upon initial hiring of an employee, and annually thereafter, an employer shall provide written notice of the requirements of this act containing the information described under subsection (a) and using the notices prepared and posted by the department under subsection (c).(c) Written notice.--Within 180 days of the effective date of this subsection, the department shall develop and prepare a written notice that employers shall distribute and provide to employees in accordance with subsection (b). The notice shall be posted on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The department shall create and make available on the 20250HB0964PN1041 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's publicly accessible Internet website posters that contain the information required under subsection (a) for employers to print at no cost.Section 8. Enforcement.(a) Penalty.--The department may order an employer who is found to be in violation of this act to do all of the following:(1) Pay an administrative fine of not more than $3,000 for each violation.(2) Pay an employee damages equal to any wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation denied or lost to the employee by reason of a violation of this act.(3) Pay an employee damages sustained by the employee as a direct result of the violation of this act.(4) Reinstate or promote an employee as may be required by this act, with or without back pay.(b) Fine.--An employer that willfully violates the posting requirement of section 7 shall pay an administrative fine of not more than $200 for each separate violation.Section 9. Civil action.(a) Action.--An aggrieved employee or the secretary may file legal action against the employer in a court of competent jurisdiction in this Commonwealth to recover damages or equitable relief on behalf of the aggrieved party under this act.(b) Relief.--(1) An employer that violates this act shall be liable for:(i) Damages equal to wages, salary, employment benefits or other compensation denied or lost to an employee by reason of a violation of this act.20250HB0964PN1041 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Damages sustained by an employee as a direct result of the violation of this act.(iii) Equitable relief as may be appropriate, including reinstatement and promotion of an employee.(2) The court in an action under this subsection may, in addition to any other award, order the employer to reimburse the employee for reasonable attorney and expert fees and other costs incurred by the employee in bringing an action under this act.Section 10. Construction.(a) Limitation.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede any provision of Federal, State or local law, collective bargaining agreement or employment benefits program, policy or plan that provides:(1) greater or more generous leave benefits or protections for employees than required under this act; or(2) leave benefits or protections for a larger population of employees than employees under this act.(b) Prohibition on subsequent collective bargaining agreement or employer policy.--An employee's right to leave or reasonable accommodations under this act may not be diminished by a collective bargaining agreement entered into or renewed, or employer policy adopted or retained, after the effective date of this subsection. An agreement by an employee to waive the employee's rights under this act is void as against public policy.(c) Employer's obligation.--This act does not diminish an employer's obligation to comply with any of the following that provides more generous leave or protections:(1) A collective bargaining agreement.20250HB0964PN1041 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) An employer policy.(3) Any other law.(d) Impact on Workers' Compensation Act.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to impact the provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act with regard to work-related injuries.(e) Impact on Public Employe Relations Act.--Nothing in this act shall be construed to supersede or preempt the rights, remedies and procedures afforded to employees or labor organizations under Federal or State law, including the act of July 23, 1970 (P.L.563, No.195), known as the Public Employe Relations Act, or any provision of a collective bargaining agreement negotiated between an employer and an exclusive representative of the employees in accordance with the Public Employe Relations Act.Section 11. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0964PN1041 - 21 - 12345678910111213141516